src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/aq-stammer_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Nomener som får -aq, miniparadigme:
    ulloriaq+N+Abs+Sg: ulloriaq
    ulloriaq+N+Rel+Sg: ullorissap
    ulloriaq+N+Trm+Sg: ullorissamut
    ulloriaq+N+Abl+Sg: [ullorissamit, ullorissaminngaanniit, ullorissamiit]
    ulloriaq+N+Lok+Sg: ullorissami
    ulloriaq+N+Aeq+Sg: ullorissatut
    ulloriaq+N+Ins+Sg: ullorissamik
    ulloriaq+N+Via+Sg: ullorissakkut
    ulloriaq+N+Abs+Pl: ullorissat
    ulloriaq+N+Rel+Pl: ullorissat
    ulloriaq+N+Trm+Pl: ullorissanut
    ulloriaq+N+Abl+Pl: [ullorissanit, ullorissaninngaanniit, ullorissaniit]
    ulloriaq+N+Lok+Pl: ullorissani
    ulloriaq+N+Aeq+Pl: ullorissatut
    ulloriaq+N+Ins+Pl: ullorissanik
    ulloriaq+N+Via+Pl: ullorissatigut

  Nomener som får -aq, possessiver:
    ulloriaq+N+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss: ulloriara
    ulloriaq+N+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss: ullorissama
    ulloriaq+N+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss: ullorissannut
    ulloriaq+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss: [ullorissannit, ullorissanniit]
    ulloriaq+N+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss: ullorissanni
    ulloriaq+N+Aeq+Sg+1SgPoss: ullorissattut
    ulloriaq+N+Ins+Sg+1SgPoss: ullorissannik
    ulloriaq+N+Via+Sg+1SgPoss: ullorissakkut
    ulloriaq+N+Abs+Pl+1SgPoss: ullorissakka
    ulloriaq+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss: ullorissama
    ulloriaq+N+Trm+Pl+1SgPoss: ullorissannut
    ulloriaq+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss: [ullorissannit, ullorissanniit]
    ulloriaq+N+Lok+Pl+1SgPoss: ullorissanni
    ulloriaq+N+Aeq+Pl+1SgPoss: ullorissattut
    ulloriaq+N+Ins+Pl+1SgPoss: ullorissannik
    ulloriaq+N+Via+Pl+1SgPoss: ullorissakkut

    ulloriaq+N+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss: ullorissat
    ulloriaq+N+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss: ullorissavit
    ulloriaq+N+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss: ullorissannut
    ulloriaq+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss: [ullorissannit, ullorissanniit]
    ulloriaq+N+Lok+Pl+2SgPoss: ullorissanni
    ulloriaq+N+Aeq+Pl+2SgPoss: ullorissattut
    ulloriaq+N+Ins+Pl+2SgPoss: ullorissannik
    ulloriaq+N+Via+Pl+2SgPoss: ullorissakkut

  Nomener som får -aq, derivativer:
    ulloriaq+UTE+nn+N+Abs+Sg: ulloriaat
    ulloriaq+UTE+nn+N+Rel+Sg: ulloriaatip
    ulloriaq+UTE+nn+N+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss: ulloriaatiga
    ulloriaq+UTE+nn+N+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss: ulloriaatima
